Hawaii, session 2026, SB1274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part III, subpart E, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Teacher workforce housing; stipend program; rural and underserved schools.  (a)  There is established a teacher workforce housing stipend program to be administered by the department to support teacher retention at any public school designated as rural or in an underserved area. (b)  An individual shall be eligible for stipend consideration if the individual: (1)  Is employed full-time by the department in a public or charter school in an area designated as rural or underserved; and (2)  Does not own a residence within commuting distance from the school at which they are employed. (c)  Stipend recipients shall receive $1,000 per month; provided that stipends awarded shall only be used only for rent, mortgage payments, or utilities. Recipients of the teacher workforce housing stipend shall submit annual documentation verifying the usage of the stipend for housing purposes pursuant to this subsection. (d)  Immediately following an award of a stipend, the recipient shall commit to teaching at a school in an area designated as rural or underserved for a minimum of three years.  A stipend recipient may continue to receive a stipend pursuant to this section following the completion of the designated number of years; provided that the recipient continues to meet eligibility requirements pursuant to subsection (b). (e)  If the recipient fails to satisfy the work requirements in accordance with subsection (d), the recipient shall repay the total amount of the stipend funds received as a loan repayable to the department.  The repayment shall be subject to the terms and conditions set by the department. (f)  The department shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session for every odd-numbered year, beginning with the regular session of 2027." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment and administration of the teacher workforce housing stipend program established pursuant to section 1 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________